Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-1782
Joint accounts.

(1) A credit union member may designate any person or persons to own a share account with the member in joint tenancy with right of survivorship, as a tenant in common, or under any other form of joint ownership permitted by law and allowed by the credit union.

(2) Payment may be made, in whole or in part, to any of the joint owners if an agreement permitting such payment was signed and dated by all persons when the shares were issued or thereafter. Payment made pursuant to this section discharges the credit union from all claims for amounts paid, whether or not the payment is consistent with the beneficial ownership of the account.

(3) If more than one joint owner seeks credit union membership through a joint account, each prospective member must meet any membership requirements described in the credit union's bylaws.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 82;

Laws 2017, LB375, § 8.